District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fiscal Year 2027 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Adoption of the federal portion of the Fiscal Year 2027 budget.
There is adopted, as a request to Congress for appropriation and authorization, the following
federal portion of the budget of the government of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year
ending September 30, 2027:
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA FEDERAL FUNDS APPROPRIATION REQUEST
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA COURTS
For salaries and expenses for the District of Columbia Courts, including the transfer and hire
of motor vehicles, $398,936,000 to be allocated as follows: for the District of Columbia Court of
Appeals, $16,626,000, of which not to exceed $2,500 is for official reception and representation
expenses; for the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, $157,517,000, of which not to exceed
$2,500 is for official reception and representation expenses; for the District of Columbia Court
System, $100,211,000, of which not to exceed $2,500 is for official reception and representation
expenses; $74,672,000, to remain available until September 30, 2028, for capital improvements for
District of Columbia courthouse facilities; and $49,910,000, to remain available until September 30,
2028, for courtroom modernization; Provided, That funds made available for capital improvements
and courtroom modernization shall be expended consistent with the District of Columbia Courts
master plan study and facilities condition assessment; Provided further, That, in addition to the
amounts appropriated herein, fees received by the District of Columbia Courts for administering bar
examinations and processing District of Columbia bar admissions may be retained and credited to
this appropriation, to remain available until expended, for salaries and expenses associated with
such activities, notwithstanding section 450 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act (section 1-
204.50, D.C. Official Code); Provided further, That notwithstanding any other provision of law, all
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
amounts under this heading shall be apportioned quarterly by the Office of Management and Budget
and obligated and expended in the same manner as funds appropriated for salaries and expenses of
Federal agencies; Provided further, That 30 days after providing written notice to the Committees
on Appropriations of the House of Representatives and the Senate, the District of Columbia Courts
may reallocate not more than $9,000,000 of the funds provided under this heading among the items
and entities funded under this heading; Provided further, That the Joint Committee on Judicial
Administration in the District of Columbia may, by regulation, establish a program substantially
similar to the program set forth in subchapter II of chapter 35 of title 5, United States Code, for
employees of the District of Columbia Courts.
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE COURT SERVICES AND
OFFENDER SUPERVISION AGENCY FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
For salaries and expenses, including the transfer and hire of motor vehicles, of the Court
Services and Offender Supervision Agency for the District of Columbia, as authorized by the
National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, $277,260,000 of
which not to exceed $2,000 is for official reception and representation expenses related to
Community Supervision and Pretrial Services Agency programs; of which not to exceed $25,000 is
for dues and assessments relating to the implementation of the Court Services and Offender
Supervision Agency Interstate Supervision Act of 2002; Provided, That, of the funds appropriated
under this heading, $193,931,000 shall be for necessary expenses of Community Supervision and
Sex Offender Registration, to include expenses relating to the monitoring of adults subject to
protection orders or the provision of services for or related to such persons; Provided further, That,
of the funds appropriated under this heading, $83,329,000 shall be available to the Pretrial Services
Agency; Provided further, That notwithstanding any other provision of law, all amounts under this
heading shall be apportioned quarterly by the Office of Management and Budget and obligated and
expended in the same manner as funds appropriated for salaries and expenses of other Federal
agencies; Provided further, That amounts under this heading may be used for programmatic
incentives for defendants to successfully complete their terms of supervision.
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA PUBLIC DEFENDER SERVICE
For salaries and expenses, including the transfer and hire of motor vehicles, of the District of
Columbia Public Defender Service, as authorized by the National Capital Revitalization and Self-
Government Improvement Act of 1997, $53,629,000; Provided, That notwithstanding any other
provision of law, all amounts under this heading shall be apportioned quarterly by the Office of
Management and Budget and obligated and expended in the same manner as funds appropriated for
salaries and expenses of Federal agencies; Provided further, That the District of Columbia Public
Defender Service may establish for employees of the District of Columbia Public Defender Service
a program substantially similar to the program set forth in subchapter II of chapter 35 of title 5,
United States Code, except that the maximum amount of the payment made under the program to
any individual may not exceed the amount referred to in section 3523(b)(3)(B) of title 5, United
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
States Code; Provided further, That for the purposes of engaging with, and receiving services from,
Federal Franchise Fund Programs established in accordance with section 403 of the Government
Management Reform Act of 1994, as amended, the District of Columbia Public Defender Service
shall be considered an agency of the United States Government; Provided further, That the District
of Columbia Public Defender Service may enter into contracts for the procurement of severable
services and multiyear contracts for the acquisition of property and services to the same extent and
under the same conditions as an executive agency under sections 3902 and 3903 of title 41, United
States Code.
FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR DEFENDER SERVICES IN DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA COURTS
For payments authorized under section 11-2604 and section 11-2605, D.C. Official Code
(relating to representation provided under the District of Columbia Criminal Justice Act), payments
for counsel appointed in proceedings in the Family Court of the Superior Court of the District of
Columbia under chapter 23 of title 16, D.C. Official Code, or pursuant to contractual agreements to
provide guardian ad litem representation, training, technical assistance, and such other services as
are necessary to improve the quality of guardian ad litem representation, payments for counsel
appointed in adoption proceedings under chapter 3 of title 16, D.C. Official Code, and payments
authorized under section 21-2060, D.C. Official Code (relating to services provided under the
District of Columbia Guardianship, Protective Proceedings, and Durable Power of Attorney Act of
1986), $52,500,000, to remain available until expended; Provided, That funds provided under this
heading shall be administered by the Joint Committee on Judicial Administration in the District of
Columbia; Provided further, That 30 days after providing written notice to the Committees on
Appropriations of the House of Representatives and the Senate, the District of Columbia Courts
may reallocate the funds provided under this heading; Provided further, That, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, this appropriation shall be apportioned quarterly by the Office of
Management and Budget and obligated and expended in the same manner as funds appropriated for
expenses of Federal agencies.
FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR RESIDENT TUITION SUPPORT
For a Federal payment to the District of Columbia, to be deposited into a dedicated account,
for a nationwide program to be administered by the Mayor, for District of Columbia resident tuition
support program established and operated under the District of Columbia College Access Act of
1999 (D.C. Official Code § 38-2701 et seq.), $40,000,000, to remain available until expended:
Provided, That the awarding of such funds may be prioritized on the basis of a resident’s academic
merit, the income and need of eligible students, and such other factors as may be authorized;
Provided further, That the District of Columbia government shall maintain a dedicated account for
the Resident Tuition Support Program that shall consist of the Federal funds appropriated to the
Program in this Act and any subsequent appropriations, any unobligated balances from prior fiscal
years, and any interest earned in this or any fiscal year; Provided further, That the account shall be
under the control of the District of Columbia Chief Financial Officer, who shall use those funds
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
solely for the purposes of carrying out the Resident Tuition Support Program; Provided further, That
the Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall provide a quarterly financial report to the Committees
on Appropriations of the House of Representatives and the Senate for these funds showing, by
object class, the expenditures made, and the purpose therefor.
FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT
For a Federal payment for a school improvement program in the District of Columbia,
$52,500,000, to remain available until expended, for payments authorized under the Scholarship for
Opportunity and Results Act (division C of Public Law 112-10); Provided, That, to the extent that
funds are available for opportunity scholarships and following the priorities included in section
3006 of such Act, the Secretary of Education shall make scholarships available to students eligible
under section 3013(3) of such Act (Public Law 112-10; 125 Stat. 211), including students who were
not offered a scholarship during any previous school year; Provided further, That within funds
provided for opportunity scholarships up to $1,200,000 shall be for the activities specified in
sections 3007(b) through 3007(d) of such Act and up to $500,000 shall be for the activities specified
in section 3009 of such Act; Provided further, That none of the funds made available under this
heading may be used for an opportunity scholarship for a student to attend a school which does not
certify to the Secretary of Education that the student will be provided with the same protections
under the Federal laws which are enforced by the Office for Civil Rights of the Department of
Education which are provided to a student of a public elementary or secondary school in the District
of Columbia and which does not certify to the Secretary of Education that the student and the
student’s parents will be provided with the same services, rights, and protections under the
Individuals With Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.) which are provided to a
student and a student’s parents of a public elementary or secondary school in the District of
Columbia, as enumerated in Table 2 of Government Accountability Office Report 18-94 (entitled
“Federal Actions Needed to Ensure Parents Are Notified About Changes in Rights for Students with
Disabilities”), issued November 2017.
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR
PAY EQUITY FUND
For a Federal payment to the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund, $5,000,000, to
remain available until expended, to cover the cost of supplemental payments for early childhood
educators made to childcare centers sponsored by federal agencies.
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE UNIVERSITY OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
For a Federal payment to the University of the District of Columbia, $11,670,000, to remain
available until expended, for enhancements to University workforce training centers.
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE COORDINATING COUNCIL
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
For a Federal payment to the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council, $3,450,000, to remain
available until expended, to support initiatives related to the coordination of Federal and local
criminal justice resources in the District of Columbia.
FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR JUDICIAL COMMISSIONS
For a Federal payment to the Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure, $555,000, to
remain available until expended, and to the Judicial Nomination Commission, $350,000, to remain
available until expended.
FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA NATIONAL GUARD
For a Federal payment to the District of Columbia National Guard, $600,000, to remain
available until expended, for the Major General David F. Wherley, Jr. District of Columbia National
Guard Retention and College Access Program.
FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR TESTING AND TREATMENT OF HIV/AIDS
For a Federal payment to the District of Columbia for the testing of individuals for, and the
treatment of individuals with, human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome in the District of Columbia, $4,000,000, to remain available until expended.
FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR EMERGENCY PLANNING AND SECURITY COSTS
IN THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
For a Federal payment of necessary expenses, as determined by the Mayor of the District of
Columbia in written consultation with the elected county or city officials of surrounding
jurisdictions, $90,000,000, to remain available until expended, for the costs of providing public
safety related to the presence of the National Capital in the District of Columbia, including support
requested by the Director of the United States Secret Service in carrying out protective duties under
the direction of the Secretary of Homeland Security, and for the costs of providing support to
respond to immediate and specific terrorist threats or attacks in the District of Columbia or
surrounding jurisdictions.
FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR METROPOLITAN POLCE DEPARTMENT RECRUITMENT
For a Federal payment to the Metropolitan Police Department of the District of Columbia,
$4,000,000, to remain available until expended, for recruitment incentives for the hiring of new
officers.
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA WATER AND SEWER AUTHORITY
For a Federal payment to the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority, $20,000,000,
to remain available until expended, to continue implementation of the Combined Sewer Overflow
Long-Term Control Plan; Provided, That the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority
provides a 100 percent match for this payment.
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY
For a Federal payment to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority,
$161,950,000, to remain available until expended, for capital and preventive maintenance projects
included in the Authority’s Capital Improvement Plan and authorized under the Passenger Rail
Investment and Improvement Act of 2008.
FEDERAL PAYMENT TO THE NATIONAL CHILDREN’S MUSEUM
For a federal payment to the National Children’s Museum, $811,000, to remain available
until expended, for community access initiatives.
Sec. 3. Compensation of the Chief Financial Officer.
Section 424(b)(2)(E) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved April 17,
1995 (109 Stat. 142; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.24b(b)(5)), is amended to read as follows:
“(E) PAY.—The Chief Financial Officer shall be paid at the greater of:
“(i) A rate such that the total amount of compensation paid during
any calendar year is equal to the limit on total pay which is applicable during the year under
section 5307 of title 5, United States Code, to an employee described in section 5307(d) of such
title; or
“(ii) A rate established in law by the District of Columbia; provided,
that any rate established pursuant to this clause which is applicable to any individual
serving as the Chief Financial Officer shall not be reduced during any period of that individual’s
service as Chief Financial Officer.”.
Sec. 4. Federal Portion Budget Request Act responsibilities.
The District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved April 17, 1995 (109 Stat. 142; D.C.
Official Code § 1-201.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 442(a) (D.C. Official Code § 1-204.42(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “At such time as the
Council may direct” and inserting the phrase “At such time and in such form as the Council may
direct” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phase “; and” and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (6A) is added to read as follows:
“(6A) A proposed request for any federal resources the Mayor believes are required
to implement the District of Columbia budget and performance goals or to fulfill the federal
government’s obligations to the District of Columbia or federal agencies or other entities that serve
District of Columbia residents; and”.
(b) Section 446(a) (D.C. Official Code § 1-204.46(a)) is amended to read as follows:
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) Adoption of Budgets and Supplements - The Council, within 70 calendar days, or as
otherwise provided by law, after receipt of a budget proposal from the Mayor, and after public
hearing, and by a vote of a majority of the members present and voting, shall adopt the annual
budget for the District of Columbia government. The annual budget shall consist of a local portion
and a federal portion. The local portion, in which the Council appropriates funds, shall be adopted
by act and shall be submitted by the Chairman of the Council to the Speaker of the House of
Representatives and the President of the Senate pursuant to the procedure set forth in section 602(c).
The federal portion, in which the Council requests the appropriation of federal funds and proposes
the enactment of legislation by Congress, shall be adopted after a single reading and shall be
submitted by the Chairman of the Council to the President for inclusion in the President’s budget
without revision by the President but subject to the President’s recommendations. Any supplements
to the annual budget shall be adopted by act of the Council, after public hearing, by a vote of a
majority of the members present and voting.”.
Sec. 5. Public Defender Service budget submission.
Title III of the District of Columbia Court Reform and Criminal Procedure Act of 1970,
approved July 29, 1970 (84 Stat. 654; D.C. Official Code § 2-1601 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 306(a) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1606(a)) is amended by striking the phrase “to
the Congress of the United States, to the chief judges of the federal courts in the District of
Columbia and of the District of Columbia courts, and to the Office of Management and Budget” and
inserting the phrase “to the Mayor and Council of the District of Columbia, to the chief judges of
the federal courts in the District of Columbia and of the District of Columbia courts, to the Congress
of the United States, and to the Office of Management and Budget” in its place.
(b) Section 307(a) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1607(a)) is amended by striking the phrase “to
the Office of Management and Budget” and inserting the phrase “to the Mayor and the Council of
the District of Columbia and shall submit such request to Congress and the Director of the Office
and Management and Budget after submitting it to the Mayor and the Council. All such requests
shall be included in the budget without revision by the President but subject to the President’s
recommendations” in its place.
Sec. 6. Court Services and Offender Supervision Agency budget submission.
Section 11233 of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (111 Stat.
748; D.C. Official Code § 24-133), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b)(2)(A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Submit annual appropriation requests for the Agency to the Mayor and
the Council of the District of Columbia and submit such requests to Congress and the Director of
the Office and Management and Budget after submitting them to the Mayor and the Council. All
such requests shall be included in the budget without revision by the President but subject to the
President’s recommendations;”.
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Subsection (e)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “to the Office of Management and
Budget” and inserting the phrase “to the Mayor and the Council of the District of Columbia and
shall submit such request to Congress and the Director of the Office and Management and Budget
after submitting it to the Mayor and the Council” in its place.
Sec. 7. Contingency cash reserve transparency.
Section 450A(b)(5) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved November 22,
2000 (114 Stat. 2440; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.50a(b)(5)), is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as subparagraph (A).
(2) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) No funds in excess of $500,000 shall be obligated or expended from the
contingency reserve fund unless such expenditures have been approved by the Council by
resolution.”.
Sec. 8. Sales and use taxes.
Notwithstanding any other law, the following sales shall be subject to the sales and use taxes
of the District of Columbia:
(1) Sales at gift shops, souvenir shops, kiosks, convenience stores, food shops,
cafeterias, restaurants, and similar establishments in federal buildings, including memorials and
museums, in the District of Columbia that make sales to:
(A) The general public, if operated by the federal government, an agent of
the federal government, or a contractor; and
(B) Other than the general public, if operated by an agent of the federal
government or a contractor; and
(2) Sales of goods and services by a government-sponsored enterprise or
corporation, institution, or organization established by federal statute or regulation (“federal
enterprise or organization”), including the Smithsonian Institution, National Gallery of Art,
National Building Museum, Federal National Mortgage Association, and Federal Home Loan
Mortgage Corporation, if the federal enterprise or organization is otherwise exempt from such
taxation, to the extent such sales otherwise would be subject to the sales and use taxes of the
District of Columbia if the federal enterprise or organization were organized as a nonprofit
corporation established pursuant to Chapter 4 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Official
Code, and exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1954, approved August 16, 1954 (68A Stat. 163; 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)).
Sec. 9. Elections board expansion.
Section 3(a) of the District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, approved August 12, 1955
(69 Stat. 699; D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.03(a)), is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is created a District of Columbia Board of Elections (hereafter in this section
referred to as the “Board”), to be composed of 5 members, no more than 3 of whom shall be of the
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
same political party, appointed by the Mayor, with the advice and consent of the Council. Members
shall be appointed to serve for terms of 3 years; except, for the members first appointed to bring the
composition of the Board from 3 to 5 members, one shall be appointed to serve a 1-year term and
one shall be appointed to serve a 2-year term running from the anniversary date for the appointment
of the existing members.”.
Sec. 10. Judicial vacancies.
The District of Columbia Courts Judicial Vacancy Reduction Act, H.R. 483, 118th Cong.
(2023), is enacted into law.
Sec. 11. Bureau of Prisons reporting.
The District of Columbia Code Returning Citizens Coordination Act, H.R. 9362, 119th
Cong. (2023), is enacted into law.
Sec. 12. National Children’s Museum.
The National Children’s Museum Act, H.R. 5937, 118th Cong. (2023), is enacted into law
Sec. 13. Electronic transmission of legislation.
The District of Columbia Electronic Transmittal of Legislation Act, H.R. 2693, 119th Cong.
(2025), is enacted into law.
Sec. 14. The federal funds for which appropriation by Congress is requested by this act
constitute the federal portion of the Fiscal Year 2027 annual budget for the District of Columbia
government under section 446(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 801; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.46(a)).
Sec. 15. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § l-301.47a).
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 16. Effective date.
This act shall take effect as provided in section 446 of the District of Columbia Home Rule
Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 801; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.46).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
10